Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.130

Duty to collect taxes.

The county treasurer, upon receipt of the tax roll, shall proceed to collect and receipt for the municipal taxes extended thereon at the same time and in the same manner as he or she proceeds in the collection of other taxes on such roll.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4062; 1963 c 4 s 36.29.130. Prior: 1893 c 72 s 7; RRS s 11334.]